Utah statutes.
62A-11-319.   Release of lien, attachment, or garnishment by department.

The office may, at any time, release a support lien, wage assignment, attachment, or garnishment on all or part of the property of the obligor, or return seized property without liability, if assurance of payment is considered adequate by the office, or if that action will facilitate collection of the support debt.  However, that release or return does not prevent future action to collect from the same or other property.  The office may also waive provisions providing for the collection of interest on accounts due, if that waiver would facilitate collection of the support debt.

